District of Columbia statutes.
8-414

Storage and disposal.

No person shall transport, store, or dispose of any pesticide or pesticide container in such a manner as to cause injury to humans, vegetation, crops, livestock, wildlife, beneficial insects, or as to pollute any waterway in a way harmful to any wildlife therein. The Mayor shall publish regulations for the storage and disposal of pesticides and pesticide containers.

History

Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-70, § 15, 24 DCR 6867

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-751.14.